el: Τύπος λεπίδας χλοοκοπτικού: Για συλλογή; Κόφτης βούρτσας; Αφαίρεση; Gator/3 σε 1; Υψηλή ανύψωση; Χαμηλή ανύψωση; Χαμηλού θορύβου; Μεσαία ανύψωση (στάνταρ); Για πολτοποίηση (Mulching); Άλλο
hu: Fűnyíró penge típusa: Bezsákolás; Bozótvágó; Gyepszellőztetés; Gator/3 az 1-ben; Magas emelésű; Alacsony emelésű; Alacsony zajszintű; Közepes emelésű (standard); Talajtakarás; Egyéb
zh-CN: 割草机刀片类型: 集草型; 割灌机; 除草刀; 鳄鱼牙/三合一; 高升力; 低升力型; 低噪音型; 中升力（标准）; 覆盖型; 其他
sk-SK: Typ čepele kosačky na trávu: Vypuklá; Krovinorezový nôž; Vertikulačný; Nôž gator/3 v 1; S vysokým zdvihom; S nízkym zdvihom; Nízka hlučnosť; So stredným zdvihom (štandardný); Mulčovacia; Iné
ja: 芝刈り機のブレードの種類: バッグ式; ブラシカッター; 除草; ゲイター/3-in-1; ハイリフト; ローリフト; 低ノイズ; ミディアムリフト（標準）; マルチング; その他
tr: Çim biçme makinesi bıçak tipi: Torbalama; Çalı biçme; Çim havalandırma; Gator/3'ü 1 arada; Yüksek kaldırma; Alçak kaldırma; Düşük gürültülü; Orta kaldırma (standart); Malçlama; Diğer
da: Plæneklipperknivtype: Med taske; Buskrydder; Afklipning; Gator/3-i-1; Højløft; Lavløft; Lav støj; Mellemløft (standard); Mulching; Andet
zh-TW: 割草機刀片類型: 集草袋; 割草機; 打草根; 鱷魚形/3 合 1; 高升力; 低升降式; 低噪音; 中升力 (標準); 覆蓋式; 其他
it: Tipo di lama del tagliaerba: A sacco; Decespugliatore; Rasatura erba; Gator/3 in 1; A elevata alzata; A bassa alzata; A bassa rumorosità; A media alzata (standard); Pacciamatura; Altro
nl: Type grasmaaierblad: Opvangbak; Bosmaaier; Verticuteermes; Gator/3-in-1; Hoogheffend; Laagheffend; Laag geluidsniveau; Middelzware hefhoogte (standaard); Mulchen; Overig
pt-BR: Tipo de lâmina de cortador de grama: Ensacamento; Roçadeira; Remoção de palha; Gator/3 em 1; Alta elevação; Baixa elevação; Baixo ruído; Média elevação (padrão); Cobertura morta; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta oštrice za kosilicu: Vreća; Rezač grmlja; Uklanjanje slame; Gator nož / 3-u-1; Visoko podizanje; Nisko podizanje; Niska razina buke; Srednje podizanje (standardno); Malčiranje; Ostalo
nb: Type gressklipperblad: Posepakking; Rysseklipper; Fjerning av dødt gress; Gator/3-i-1; Høyløft; Lavløft; Støysvak; Middels løft (standard); Jorddekking; Annet
pl: Typ ostrza kosiarki: Z wyrzutem do worka; Nóż do wykaszania; Nóż do wertykulacji; Gator/3 w 1; Wysokiego podnoszenia; Niskiego podnoszenia; Cicha praca; Średniego podnoszenia (standard); Do mulczowania; Pozostałe
sv: Typ av gräsklipparblad: Säckväv; Röjsåg; Vertikalisering; Gator/3-i-1; Höglyft; Låglyft; Låg bullernivå; Medellång lyft (standard); Kompostering; Övrigt
ru: Тип ножа газонокосилки: Для сбора в травосборник; Кусторез; Скарификатор; Gator/3-в-1; С высоким подъемом; С низким подъемом; Малошумный; Со средним подъемом (стандартный); Для мульчирования; Другой
es: Tipo de cuchilla de cortacésped: En bolsas; Desbrozadora; Deshierbe; Gator/3 en 1; Elevación alta; Elevación baja; Bajo ruido; Elevación media (estándar); Mantillo; Otros
th: ประเภทใบมีดเครื่องตัดหญ้า: การบรรจุถุง; เครื่องตัดวัชพืช; กำจัดชั้นหญ้าแห้งสะสม; ใบมีดแบบเกเตอร์/3 รูปแบบ; ใบมีดแบบยกสูง; ใบมีดแบบยกต่ำ; นอยซ์ต่ำ; ใบมีดแบบยกปานกลาง (มาตรฐาน); การคลุมดิน; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại lưỡi máy cắt cỏ: Đóng túi; Máy cắt bụi rậm; Cào cỏ nền; Lưỡi cắt đa năng 3 trong 1; Lực nâng cao; Lực nâng thấp; Ít ồn; Lực nâng trung bình (tiêu chuẩn); Lớp phủ; Khác
de: Typ des Rasenmähermessers: Sammelbeutel; Freischneider; Vertikutieren; Gator/3-in-1; High-Lift; Low-Lift; Rauscharm; Mittlere Hubhöhe (Standard); Mulchen; Sonstiges
en: Lawn mower blade type: Bagging; Brush cutter; Dethatching; Gator/3-in-1; High-lift; Low-lift; Low-noise; Medium-lift (standard); Mulching; Other
fr: Type de lame de tondeuse: Ensachage; Débroussailleuse; Scarification; Gator/3-en-1; Haute levée; Basse levée; Faible bruit; Levée moyenne (standard); Paillage; Autre
ko: 잔디깎기 날 유형: 포대 수집; 브러시 커터; 디태칭; 게이터/3-in-1; 하이 리프트; 로우 리프트; 저소음; 미디엄 리프트(표준형); 멀칭; 기타
lt-LT: Vejapjovės peilio tipas: Maišeliavimas; Krūmapjovė; Šiaudinių nuėmimas; „Gator“ / 3 viename; Aukštas pakėlimas; Žemas pakėlimas; Mažas triukšmas; Vidutinio aukščio (standartinis); Mulčiavimas; Kita
cs: Typ čepele k zahradní sekačce: Sběrací; Na křoviny; Vertikutační; Gator / 3 v 1; Zdvihací; Nízký zdvih; Nízká hlučnost; Se středním zdvihem (standardní); Mulčování; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de lâmina de corta-relva: Ensacamento; Roçadeira; Descompactação do solo; Gator/3 em 1; Alta elevação; Baixa elevação; Ruído reduzido; Média elevação (padrão); Mulching; Outro
bg-BG: Тип острие за косачка за трева: С функция за събиране; Тример за храсти; Отстраняване на мъх; Gator/3-в-1; Високо повдигане; Нисък подем; Нисък шум; Средно повдигане (стандартно); Мулчиране; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta rezila kosilnice: Pakiranje; Kosilec grmovja; Odstranjevanje slame; Gator/3-v-1; Visok dvig; Nizko dviganje; Nize; Srednje dvignjeno (standardno); Mulčenje; Druga
fi: Ruohonleikkurin terän tyyppi: Keräävä; Raivaussaha; Irrottava; Gator/3-toiminen; Korkea nosto; Matala nosto; Matalaääninen; Keskikorkea nosto (vakio); Silppuava; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul lamei de tuns iarba: Cu colectare; Lamă pentru tufișuri; Decompactare; Gator/3 în 1; Ridicare înaltă; Ridicare redusă; Silențios; Ridicare medie (standard); Mulcire; Altele